Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.130

Parole-revoked offender as escapee.

From and after the suspension, cancellation, or revocation of the parole of any offender convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, and until his or her return to custody the offender shall be deemed an escapee and a fugitive from justice. The indeterminate sentence review board may deny credit against the maximum sentence any time during which he or she is an escapee and fugitive from justice.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 340; 1993 c 140 s 3; 1955 c 133 s 14. Prior: 1939 c 142 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 4, part; RRS s 10249-4, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.